North Carolina, session 2025, HB483.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. EXTEND TERMS OF PROBATION AND POST-RELEASE SUPERVISION
FOR YOUTH ADJUDICATED OF CERTAIN VIOLENT OFFENSES AND CLARIFY A
VICTIM'S RIGHT TO BE NOTIFIED ABOUT TERMINATION OF PROBATION OR
POST-RELEASE SUPERVISION
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 7B-2510 reads as rewritten:
"§ 7B-2510. Conditions of probation; violation of probation.
…
(c) An order of probation shall remain in force for a period not to exceed one year from
the date entered. Prior Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c1) of this section, prior to
expiration of an order of probation, the court may extend it for an additional period of one year
after notice and a hearing, if the court finds that the extension is necessary to protect the
community or to safeguard the welfare of the juvenile. At the discretion of the court, the hearing
*H483-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
to determine to extend probation may occur after the expiration of an order of probation at the
next regularly scheduled court date or if the juvenile fails to appear in court.
(c1) Prior to expiration of an order of probation entered for an adjudication of an offense
that would be a Class A, B1, or B2 felony if committed by an adult, the court may extend the
term of probation for additional periods of up to one year after notice and a hearing, if the court
finds that the extension is necessary to protect the community or to safeguard the welfare of the
juvenile. The total period of probation entered for an adjudication of an offense that would be a
Class A, B1, or B2 felony if committed by an adult shall not exceed three years. At the discretion
of the court, the hearing to determine to extend probation may occur after the expiration of an
order of probation at the next regularly scheduled court date or if the juvenile fails to appear in
court.
(d) On motion of the juvenile court counselor or counselor, the juvenile, the prosecutor,
or on the court's own motion, the court may review the progress of any juvenile on probation at
any time during the period of probation or at the end of probation. The conditions or duration of
probation may be modified only as provided in this Subchapter and only after notice and a
hearing.
…."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 7B-2511 reads as rewritten:
"§ 7B-2511. Termination of probation.
At the end of or at any time during probation, the court may terminate probation by written
order upon finding that there is no further need for supervision. The Except for cases that involve
a victim as defined in Article 20A of this Chapter, the finding and order terminating probation
may be entered in chambers in the absence of the juvenile and may be based on a report from the
juvenile court counselor or, at the election of the court, the order may be entered with the juvenile
present after notice and a hearing. In cases involving a victim as defined in Article 20A of this
Chapter, the order may be entered with the juvenile present after notice and a hearing. If a victim
has requested to be notified of court proceedings pursuant to G.S. 7B-2053, the Division of
Juvenile Justice shall provide notice to the victim, and the court shall provide the prosecutor, the
victim, or the person who may assert the victim's rights as set forth in Article 20A of this Chapter
the opportunity to be heard at the hearing."
SECTION 1.(c) G.S. 7B-2514 reads as rewritten:
"§ 7B-2514. Post-release supervision planning; release.
…
(b) The Division shall develop the plan in writing and base the terms on the needs of the
juvenile and the protection of the public. Every Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b1)
of this section, every plan shall require the juvenile to complete at least 90 days, but not more
than one year, of post-release supervision.
(b1) Every plan developed for an offense that would be a Class A, B1, B2, or C felony if
committed by an adult shall require the juvenile to complete three years of post-release
supervision. The Division shall develop the plan in writing and base the terms on the needs of
the juvenile and the protection of the public.
…
(g) A juvenile on post-release supervision shall be supervised by a juvenile court
counselor. Post-release supervision shall be terminated by order of the court. For plans developed
pursuant to subsection (b1) of this section, post-release supervision may be terminated with the
juvenile present after notice and a hearing. If a victim has requested to be notified of court
proceedings pursuant to G.S. 7B-2053, the Division of Juvenile Justice shall provide notice to
the victim, and the court shall provide the prosecutor, the victim, or the person who may assert
the victim's rights as set forth in Article 20A of this Chapter the opportunity to be heard at the
hearing."

Page 2 House Bill 483-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
PART II. MODIFY THE CRITERIA FOR SECURE CUSTODY TO CLARIFY THAT A
SUPERIOR COURT JUDGE MAY ENTER A SECURE CUSTODY ORDER
FOLLOWING THE REMOVAL OF A CASE TO JUVENILE COURT AND
AUTHORIZE THE ISSUANCE OF A SECURE CUSTODY ORDER IN RESPONSE TO
THE VIOLATION OF A CHAPTER 50B DOMESTIC VIOLENCE PROTECTIVE
ORDER
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 7B-1903 reads as rewritten:
"§ 7B-1903. Criteria for secure or nonsecure custody.
(a) When a request is made for nonsecure custody, the court shall first consider release
of the juvenile to the juvenile's parent, guardian, custodian, or other responsible adult. An order
for nonsecure custody shall be made only when there is a reasonable factual basis to believe the
matters alleged in the petition petition, or in the indictment or criminal information if the request
is made pursuant to G.S. 15A-960, are true, and that:
(1) The juvenile is a runaway and consents to nonsecure custody; or
(2) The juvenile meets one or more of the criteria for secure custody, but the court
finds it in the best interests of the juvenile that the juvenile be placed in a
nonsecure placement.
(b) When a request is made for secure custody, the court may order secure custody only
where the court finds there is a reasonable factual basis to believe that the juvenile committed
the offense as alleged in the petition, petition or in the indictment or criminal information if the
request is made pursuant to G.S. 15A-960, and that one of the following circumstances exists:
(1) The juvenile is charged with a felony and has demonstrated that the juvenile
is a danger to property or persons.
(1a) The juvenile is charged with the violation of a valid protective order entered
pursuant to Chapter 50B of the General Statutes and is alleged to have
knowingly violated conditions of the protective order excluding the juvenile
from the residence or household occupied by a victim of domestic violence or
directing the juvenile to refrain from doing any or all of the acts specified in
G.S. 50B-3(a)(9).
…."
SECTION 2.(b) G.S. 50B-4.1(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) A law enforcement officer shall arrest and take a person into custody, with or without
a warrant or other process, if the officer has probable cause to believe that the person knowingly
has violated a valid protective order excluding the person from the residence or household
occupied by a victim of domestic violence or directing the person to refrain from doing any or
all of the acts specified in G.S. 50B-3(a)(9). If the person is under the age of 18, the law
enforcement officer shall request that a juvenile petition be filed for the alleged violation of a
valid protective order entered pursuant to this Chapter and shall request the issuance of a secure
custody order pursuant to G.S. 7B-1903."

PART III. CLARIFY THAT ALL FELONY SCHOOL NOTIFICATIONS ARE LIMITED
TO CLASS A THROUGH CLASS E FELONIES
SECTION 3. G.S. 7B-3101(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Notwithstanding G.S. 7B-3000, the juvenile court counselor shall deliver verbal and
written notification of any of the following actions to the principal of the school that the juvenile
attends:
(1) A petition is filed under G.S. 7B-1802 that alleges delinquency for an offense
that would constitute a Class A, B1, B2, C, D, or E felony if committed by an
adult. The principal of the school shall make an individualized decision related
to the status of the student during the pendency of the matter and not have an
automatic suspension policy.
House Bill 483-Second Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) The court transfers jurisdiction over a juvenile to the superior court under
G.S. 7B-2200.5 or G.S. 7B-2200.G.S. 7B-2200 for an offense that would
constitute a Class A, B1, B2, C, D, or E felony if committed by an adult.
(3) The court dismisses under G.S. 7B-2411 the petition that alleges delinquency
for an offense that would be a Class A, B1, B2, C, D, or E felony if committed
by an adult.
(4) The court issues a dispositional order under Article 25 of Chapter 7B of the
General Statutes including, but not limited to, an order of probation that
requires school attendance, concerning a juvenile alleged or found delinquent
for an offense that would be a Class A, B1, B2, C, D, or E felony if committed
by an adult.
(5) The court modifies or vacates any order or disposition under G.S. 7B-2600
concerning a juvenile alleged or found delinquent for an offense that would
be a Class A, B1, B2, C, D, or E felony if committed by an adult.
Notification of the school principal in person or by telephone shall be made before the
beginning of the next school day. Delivery shall be made as soon as practicable but at least within
five days of the action. Delivery shall be made in person or by certified mail. Notification that a
petition has been filed shall describe the nature of the offense. Notification of a dispositional
order, a modified or vacated order, or a transfer to superior court shall describe the court's action
and any applicable disposition requirements. As used in this subsection, the term "offense" does
not include any offense under Chapter 20 of the General Statutes."

PART IV. EXTEND THE RETENTION PERIOD FOR CLOSED COMPLAINTS TO
ALLOW FOR REVIEW BY THE PROSECUTOR
SECTION 4. G.S. 7B-1703(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) If the juvenile court counselor determines that a petition should not be filed or the
complaint handled as a juvenile consultation, the juvenile court counselor shall notify the
complainant and the victim, if the complainant is not the victim, immediately in writing with
specific reasons for the decision, whether or not legal sufficiency was found, and whether the
matter was closed or diverted and retained, and shall include notice of the complainant's and
victim's right to have the decision reviewed by the prosecutor. The juvenile court counselor shall
sign the complaint after indicating on it:
(1) The date of the determination;
(2) The words "Not Approved for Filing"; and
(3) Whether the matter is "Closed" or "Diverted and Retained".
Except as provided in G.S. 7B-1706, any complaint not approved for filing as a juvenile
petition or handled as a juvenile consultation shall be destroyed by the juvenile court counselor
after holding the complaint for a temporary period of at least one year to allow review as provided
in G.S. 7B-1704 and G.S. 7B-1705."

PART V. CREATE A CRIMINAL OFFENSE FOR ESCAPING FROM A JUVENILE
JUSTICE FACILITY OR OFFICER
SECTION 5. Article 33 of Chapter 14 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 14-256.2. Escape from juvenile detention facilities or officers.
(a) Offense and Punishment. – If any person shall break any detention facility, holdover
facility, or youth development center, being lawfully detained therein, or shall escape from the
lawful custody of any employee, guard, or officer of the Division of Juvenile Justice of the
Department of Public Safety, the person is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor, except that the person
is guilty of a Class H felony if any of the following apply:
Page 4 House Bill 483-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) The person has been charged with a felony and has been committed to the
facility pending trial or transfer to the State prison system.
(2) The person is alleged to be within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court for an
offense that would be a felony if committed by an adult and has been placed
in secure custody.
(3) The person has been adjudicated delinquent for an offense that would be a
felony if committed by an adult and has been placed in secure custody or
committed to the custody of the Division of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency
Prevention for placement in a youth development center.
(b) Definitions. – For purposes of this section, the terms "detention facility," "holdover
facility," and "youth development center" are as defined in G.S. 7B-1501."

PART VI. CLARIFY AND MAKE TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS TO THE JUVENILE
CAPACITY TO PROCEED PROCESS
SECTION 6.(a) G.S. 7B-2401.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 7B-2401.2. Procedures to determine capacity; hearing procedures; evidence.
…
(e) Any report made to the court pursuant to this section shall be forwarded to the clerk
of superior court in a sealed envelope addressed to the attention of a presiding judge, with a
covering statement to the clerk of the fact of the examination of the juvenile and any conclusion
as to whether the juvenile has or lacks capacity to proceed. If the juvenile is being held in the
custody of the Division, the The clerk shall send a copy of the covering statement to the Division.
The Division and any persons employed by the Division shall maintain the copy of the covering
statement as a confidential record. A copy of the full report shall be forwarded to the juvenile's
counsel. If the question of the juvenile's capacity to proceed is raised at any time, a copy of the
full report must be forwarded to the prosecutor. Until the question of the juvenile's capacity is
raised, the full report to the court shall be kept under such conditions as are directed by the court,
and its contents shall not be revealed except the report and the relevant confidential information
previously ordered released under G.S. 7B-2401.3(c) shall be released to the program where the
juvenile is receiving remediation services and as directed by the court. revealed. Any report made
to the court pursuant to this section shall be maintained as a confidential record.
…
(h) When the capacity of the juvenile to proceed is questioned, the court shall hold a
hearing to determine the juvenile's capacity to proceed. If an evaluation is ordered pursuant to
subsection (b) of this section, the hearing shall be held upon receipt of the forensic evaluation
report. The clerk shall provide notice to the juvenile and juvenile, the prosecutor prosecutor, and
the chief court counselor in accordance with G.S. 7B-1807. The order of the court shall contain
findings of fact to support its determination of the juvenile's capacity to proceed. The parties may
stipulate that the juvenile is capable to proceed but shall not be allowed to stipulate that the
juvenile lacks capacity to proceed. If the court finds the juvenile is capable to proceed, the
juvenile proceedings shall no longer be stayed, and the court shall set a date for such further
proceedings. If the juvenile's capacity to proceed is contested, the juvenile bears the burden of
proving the juvenile is incapable to proceed by a preponderance of the evidence. At a contested
hearing, the State and the juvenile may call witnesses and present evidence. Nothing in this
subsection may be construed to prohibit the State or the juvenile from calling other expert
witnesses to testify at a capacity hearing. If appropriate, the If the court finds that the juvenile is
not capable to proceed, the court must determine if the juvenile is substantially likely to attain
capacity in the foreseeable future. If the court finds that the juvenile is substantially likely to
attain capacity in the foreseeable future, the court may order remediation services in accordance
with G.S. 7B-2401.4.
…."
House Bill 483-Second Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 6.(b) G.S. 7B-2401.4 reads as rewritten:
"§ 7B-2401.4. Remediation.
…
(b) When the court finds the juvenile incapable to proceed, and substantially likely to
attain capacity in the foreseeable future, the court may order remediation services. The
remediation services shall be based on the recommendations from the forensic evaluation. All
forensic evaluations for the juvenile and the relevant confidential information previously ordered
released under G.S. 7B-2401.3(c) shall be released to the program or programs where the juvenile
is receiving remediation services as directed by the court.
…
(e) An order for remediation services shall contain all of the following:
(1) Written findings of fact regarding the least restrictive environment for the
remediation services.
(2) If the court order allows for secure confinement pursuant to subsection (d) of
this section, the maximum time for placement in a secure facility shall be
pursuant to subsection (f) of this section.
(3) Whether remediation services shall include mental health treatment to reduce
interfering symptoms, specialized psychoeducational programming, or a
combination of these interventions. If both mental health services and
psychoeducational programming are ordered, the court shall identify a
provider for each service.
…
(g) The Division shall be responsible for the provision of psychoeducation remediation
programming and working with community partners to secure any additional services
recommended in the forensic evaluation report. The Division is authorized to contract with the
University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill or any other qualified educational organization to
develop and conduct related trainings and curriculum.
The remediation service provider or providers shall provide reports to the court at least every
90 days. Any report made to the court pursuant to this subsection shall be forwarded to the clerk
of superior court addressed to the attention of the presiding judge. judge and to the juvenile's
attorney. A report provided under this subsection shall include all of the following:
(1) The dates of any services provided to the juvenile.
(2) A summary of the juvenile's attendance and participation.
(3) Information about the juvenile's progress in the areas that were found to be
relevant to the juvenile's incapacity, incapacity and that are the focus of the
provider's services, including education regarding court procedures and
stabilization or improvement of symptoms leading to functional impairments.
No statement or disclosure made by the juvenile during the remediation services regarding
the juvenile's responsibility for a criminal act that can result either in an adjudication of
delinquency or transfer of a matter to superior court for trial as an adult is admissible in any
juvenile or criminal proceeding against the juvenile or defendant. All remediation progress
reports, summaries, and notes shall not include any such statement.
The court shall hold a hearing within 30 days of receipt of the remediation progress report to
review the remediation services. The remediation review hearing may be informal, and the court
may consider all remediation progress reports. The court may consider any evidence, including
hearsay evidence as defined in G.S. 8C-1, Rule 801, that the court finds to be relevant, reliable,
and necessary to determine if remediation services should continue or reassessment of capacity
is warranted. The juvenile and the juvenile's parent, guardian, or custodian shall have an
opportunity to present evidence, and they may advise the court concerning the remediation
services. The order of the court may be amended or supplemented only as provided in this
Subchapter and only after notice and a hearing.
Page 6 House Bill 483-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
…
(i) If, at any time during the remediation treatment, the remediation service provider
finds that the juvenile has likely completed the requirements of the remediation services, the
remediation service provider shall provide written notification to the court, the prosecutor, and
the juvenile's attorney within two business days regarding this finding. A copy of any remediation
report or reports shall be forwarded to the court and to the juvenile's attorney. The court may
order the release of a remediation report to the prosecutor after providing the juvenile with
reasonable notice and an opportunity to be heard and then determining that the information is
relevant and necessary to the hearing of the matter before the court and unavailable from any
other source. This subsection shall not be construed to relieve any court of its duty to conduct
hearings and make findings required under relevant federal law before ordering the release of
any private medical or mental health information or records related to substance abuse or HIV
status or treatment. The records shall be withheld from public inspection and, except as provided
in this subsection, may be examined only by order of the court. The juvenile's matter shall be
returned to court within a reasonable time, and not more than 30 days after the completion of
remediation services, for a remediation review or further proceedings.hearing.
(j) Any remediation report completed by a psychoeducation provider on the juvenile's
progress in the psychoeducation curriculum shall be provided by the clerk of superior court to
the prosecutor and the chief court counselor.
(k) The court may order the release of any remediation report that contains information
about the juvenile's mental health treatment to the prosecutor after providing the juvenile with
reasonable notice and an opportunity to be heard and then determining that the information is
relevant and necessary to the hearing of the matter before the court and unavailable from any
other source. This subsection shall not be construed to relieve any court of its duty to conduct
hearings and make findings required under relevant federal law before ordering the release of
any private medical or mental health information or records related to substance abuse or HIV
status or treatment. The records shall be withheld from public inspection and, except as provided
in this subsection, may be examined only by order of the court.
(l) The court shall hold a remediation review hearing within 30 days of receipt of the
remediation progress report or reports or notification that the juvenile has likely completed the
requirements of the remediation services. The remediation review hearing may be informal, and
the court may consider all remediation progress reports. The court may consider any evidence,
including hearsay evidence as defined in G.S. 8C-1, Rule 801, that the court finds to be relevant,
reliable, and necessary to determine if a remediation service or services should continue,
reassessment of capacity is warranted, or the juvenile is not substantially likely to attain capacity
in the foreseeable future. The juvenile and the juvenile's parent, guardian, or custodian shall have
an opportunity to present evidence, and they may advise the court concerning the remediation
service or services. The order of the court requiring remediation service or services may be
amended or supplemented only as provided in this Subchapter and only after notice and a hearing.
If the court determines that reassessment of capacity is warranted, the court shall order a new
forensic evaluation pursuant to the procedure contained in G.S. 7B-2401.2. This forensic
evaluation shall be performed by the original forensic evaluator when possible and comply with
the requirements of G.S. 7B-2401.3. Any forensic evaluation shall be conducted independently
of the remediation services and shall not be conducted by the remediation provider or providers.
A capacity hearing shall be held pursuant to the requirements in G.S. 7B-2401.2 upon receipt of
the forensic evaluation report.
If the court determines that the juvenile is not substantially likely to attain capacity in the
foreseeable future, the court shall proceed according to G.S. 7B-2401.5."

PART VII. CLARIFYING THE PROCESS TO REMOVE A JUVENILE FROM
SUPERIOR COURT TO JUVENILE COURT
House Bill 483-Second Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 7.(a) G.S. 7B-1701 reads as rewritten:
"§ 7B-1701. Preliminary inquiry.
(a) When a complaint is received against a juvenile at least 10 years of age, the juvenile
court counselor shall make a preliminary determination as to whether the juvenile is within the
jurisdiction of the court as a delinquent or undisciplined juvenile. If the juvenile court counselor
finds that the facts contained in the complaint do not state a case within the jurisdiction of the
court, that legal sufficiency has not been established, or that the matters alleged are frivolous, the
juvenile court counselor, without further inquiry, shall refuse authorization to file the complaint
as a petition.
If a complaint against the juvenile has not been previously received, as determined by the
juvenile court counselor, the juvenile court counselor shall make reasonable efforts to meet with
the juvenile and the juvenile's parent, guardian, or custodian if the offense is divertible.
When requested by the juvenile court counselor, the prosecutor shall assist in determining
the sufficiency of evidence as it affects the quantum of proof and the elements of offenses.
The juvenile court counselor, without further inquiry, shall authorize the complaint to be filed
as a petition if removal has been ordered pursuant to G.S. 15A-960 or the juvenile court counselor
finds reasonable grounds to believe that the juvenile has committed one of the following
nondivertible offenses:
(1) Murder;
(2) First-degree rape or second degree rape;
(3) First-degree sexual offense or second degree sexual offense;
(4) Arson;
(5) Any violation of Article 5, Chapter 90 of the General Statutes that would
constitute a felony if committed by an adult;
(6) First degree burglary;
(7) Crime against nature; or
(8) Any felony which involves the willful infliction of serious bodily injury upon
another or which was committed by use of a deadly weapon.
(b) When a complaint is received against a juvenile less than 10 years of age, the juvenile
court counselor shall make a preliminary determination as to whether the juvenile is a vulnerable
juvenile or is within the jurisdiction of the court as a delinquent juvenile. If the juvenile court
counselor determines the juvenile is within the jurisdiction of the court as a delinquent juvenile,
the juvenile court counselor shall proceed with the complaint pursuant to subsection (a) of this
section. If the juvenile court counselor determines the juvenile is a vulnerable juvenile, the
juvenile court counselor shall handle the complaint as a juvenile consultation for a vulnerable
juvenile."
SECTION 7.(b) G.S. 7B-1803 reads as rewritten:
"§ 7B-1803. Receipt of complaints; filing of petition.
(a) All complaints concerning a juvenile alleged to be delinquent or undisciplined shall
be referred to the juvenile court counselor for screening and evaluation. Thereafter, if the juvenile
court counselor determines that a petition should be filed, the petition shall be drawn by the
juvenile court counselor or the clerk, signed by the complainant, and verified before an official
authorized to administer oaths. If the circumstances indicate a need for immediate attachment of
jurisdiction and if the juvenile court counselor is out of the county or otherwise unavailable to
receive a complaint and to draw a petition when it is needed, the clerk shall assist the complainant
in communicating the complaint to the juvenile court counselor by telephone and, with the
approval of the juvenile court counselor, shall draw a petition and file it when signed and verified.
A copy of the complaint and petition shall be transmitted to the juvenile court counselor.
(b) If review is requested pursuant to G.S. 7B-1704, the prosecutor shall review a
complaint and any decision of the juvenile court counselor not to authorize that the complaint be
filed as a petition. If the prosecutor, after review, authorizes a complaint to be filed as a petition,
Page 8 House Bill 483-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
the prosecutor shall prepare the complaint to be filed by the clerk as a petition, recording the day
of filing.
(c) If removal is ordered pursuant to G.S. 15A-960, the prosecutor shall prepare the
petition and sign it as the complainant. The warrant for arrest, magistrate's order, or indictment
shall serve as the verified allegation to support the complaint and shall be included in the juvenile
record by the clerk."
SECTION 7.(c) G.S. 15A-960 reads as rewritten:
"§ 15A-960. Removal of juveniles charged with committing Class A, B1, B2, C, D, or E
felony offenses at age 16 and 17.
(a) Any time after an indictment has been returned or a criminal information has been
issued for a Class A, B1, B2, C, D, or E felony, excluding offenses constituting violations of the
motor vehicle laws under Chapter 20 of the General Statutes, and before the jury is sworn and
impaneled, the superior court shall order the removal of the action to juvenile court upon joint
motion of the prosecutor and the defendant's attorney. The order shall be in writing and shall
require the chief court counselor or his or her designee to file a juvenile petition in the case within
10 five calendar days after removal is ordered. In cases where a true bill of indictment has been
returned by the grand jury, a copy of the indictment shall accompany the order of removal to the
juvenile court. In cases where a criminal information is filed, a copy of the criminal information
and the warrant for arrest or magistrate's order shall accompany the order of removal to the
juvenile court. The prosecutor shall provide the chief court counselor or his or her designee with
a copy of the joint motion prior to submitting the motion to the court. Following the entry of
removal order, the prosecutor shall draw the juvenile petition, sign the petition as the
complainant, and submit it to the chief court counselor or his or her designee. The warrant for
arrest, magistrate's order, or indictment shall serve as the verified allegation to support the
complaint and shall be included in the juvenile record by the clerk. The case shall proceed
pursuant to the procedures in Subchapter II of Chapter 7B of the General Statutes.
(b) The superior court shall expunge the criminal charges and superior court record in
accordance with G.S. 15A-145.8 at the time of removal and, if the defendant meets the criteria
established in G.S. 7B-1903, may issue an order for secure custody upon the request of a
prosecutor. The prosecutor shall provide a copy of any issued secure custody order to the chief
court counselor or his or her designee, as soon as possible and no more than 24 hours after the
order is issued."
SECTION 7.(d) G.S. 7B-3000(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) The clerk shall maintain a complete record of all juvenile cases filed in the clerk's
office to be known as the juvenile record. The record shall include the summons and petition,
any secure or nonsecure custody order, any electronic or mechanical recording of hearings, and
any written motions, orders, or papers filed in the proceeding.proceeding or documents
accompanying the order to remove cases from superior court pursuant to G.S. 15A-960."

PART VIII. CLARIFY THE PLACE OF CONFINEMENT FOR PERSONS UNDER 18
YEARS OF AGE WHO ARE SENTENCED TO IMPRISONMENT IN THE
DEPARTMENT OF ADULT CORRECTION
SECTION 8.(a) G.S. 7A-109.3 reads as rewritten:
"§ 7A-109.3. Delivery of commitment order.
…
(a1) If the district court sentences a person under the age of 18 to imprisonment and
commitment, commitment to the custody of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult
Correction, the clerk of superior court shall furnish the detention facility approved by the
Division of Juvenile Justice Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction with the
signed order of commitment within 48 hours of the issuance of the sentence.
…
House Bill 483-Second Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c) If the superior court sentences a person under the age of 18 to imprisonment and
commitment, commitment to the custody of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult
Correction, the clerk of superior court shall furnish the detention facility approved by the
Division of Juvenile Justice Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction with the
signed order of commitment within 48 hours of the issuance of the sentence."
SECTION 8.(b) G.S. 15A-521 reads as rewritten:
"§ 15A-521. Commitment to detention facility pending trial.
(a) Commitment. – Every person charged with a crime and held in custody who has not
been released pursuant to Article 26 of this Chapter, Bail, must be committed by a written order
of the judicial official who conducted the initial appearance as provided in Article 24 to an
appropriate detention facility as provided in this section. If the person being committed by written
order is under the age of 18, that person must shall be committed to the custody of the Division
of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety and shall be confined in a detention facility
approved by the Division of Juvenile Justice to provide secure confinement and care for
juveniles, or to a holdover facility as defined in G.S. 7B-1501(11). If the person being committed
reaches the age of 18 years while held in custody, the person shall be transported by personnel
of the Juvenile Justice Division, Division of Juvenile Justice, or personnel approved by the
Juvenile Justice Division, Division of Juvenile Justice, to the custody of the sheriff of the county
where the charges arose.
…
(c) Copies and Use of Order, Receipt of Prisoner. –
(1) The order of commitment must be delivered to a law-enforcement officer, who
must deliver the order and the prisoner to the detention facility named therein.
(2) The jailer or personnel of the Juvenile Justice Division of Juvenile Justice
must receive the prisoner and the order of commitment, and note on the order
of commitment the time and date of receipt. As used in this subdivision,
"jailer" includes any person having control of a detention facility and
"personnel of the Juvenile Justice Division" Division of Juvenile Justice"
includes personnel approved by the Juvenile Justice Division.Division of
Juvenile Justice.
(3) Upon releasing the prisoner pursuant to the terms of the order, or upon
delivering the prisoner to the court, the jailer or personnel of the Juvenile
Justice Division of Juvenile Justice must note the time and date on the order
and return it to the clerk. Personnel of the Juvenile Justice Division, Division
of Juvenile Justice, or personnel approved by the Juvenile Justice Division,
Division of Juvenile Justice, shall transport the person under the age of 18
from the juvenile detention facility or holdover facility to court and shall
transfer the person back to the juvenile detention facility or holdover facility.
(4) Repealed by Session Laws 1975, 2nd Sess., c. 983, s. 142.
…."
SECTION 8.(c) G.S. 15A-1301 reads as rewritten:
"§ 15A-1301. Order of commitment to imprisonment when not otherwise specified.
When a judicial official orders that a defendant be imprisoned he must issue an appropriate
written commitment order. When the commitment is to a sentence of imprisonment, the
commitment must include the identification and class of the offense or offenses for which the
defendant was convicted and, if the sentences are consecutive, the maximum sentence allowed
by law upon conviction of each offense for the punishment range used to impose the sentence for
the class of offense and prior record or conviction level, and, if the sentences are concurrent or
consolidated, the longest of the maximum sentences allowed by law for the classes of offense
and prior record or conviction levels upon conviction of any of the offenses. If the person
sentenced to imprisonment is under the age of 18, the person must shall be committed to a
Page 10 House Bill 483-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
detention facility approved by the Division of Juvenile Justice to provide secure confinement and
care for juveniles. the custody of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction
and shall be confined in a facility operated by the Division of Prisons. If the person is under the
age of 18, the person may be temporarily confined in a holdover facility as defined in
G.S. 7B-1501(11) until the person can be transferred to a juvenile detention facility. facility
operated by the Division of Prisons. Personnel of the Juvenile Justice Division of Juvenile Justice
or personnel approved by the Juvenile Justice Division of Juvenile Justice shall transport the
person to the juvenile detention Division of Prisons facility or the holdover facility.facility, if the
person is in the custody of the Division of Juvenile Justice at the time of commitment."
SECTION 8.(d) G.S. 15A-1343(a1)(3) reads as rewritten:
"(3) Submission to a period or periods of confinement in a local confinement
facility for a total of no more than six days per month during any three separate
months during the period of probation. The six days per month confinement
provided for in this subdivision may only be imposed as two-day or three-day
consecutive periods. When a defendant is on probation for multiple
judgments, confinement periods imposed under this subdivision shall run
concurrently and may total no more than six days per month. If the person
being ordered to a period or periods of confinement is under the age of 18,
that person must shall be committed to the custody of the Division of Prisons
of the Department of Adult Correction and shall be confined in a detention
facility approved by the Division of Juvenile Justice to provide secure
confinement and care for juveniles or to a holdover facility as defined in
G.S. 7B-1501(11). operated by the Division of Prisons. If the person being
ordered to a period or periods of confinement reaches the age of 18 years while
in confinement, the person may be transported by personnel of the Division
of Juvenile Justice, Prisons, or personnel approved by the Division of Juvenile
Justice, Prisons, to the custody of the sheriff of the applicable local
confinement facility."
SECTION 8.(e) G.S. 15A-1343.2(e)(5) reads as rewritten:
"(5) Submit to a period or periods of confinement in a local confinement facility
for a total of no more than six days per month during any three separate
months during the period of probation. The six days per month confinement
provided for in this subdivision may only be imposed as two-day or three-day
consecutive periods. When a defendant is on probation for multiple
judgments, confinement periods imposed under this subdivision shall run
concurrently and may total no more than six days per month. If the person
being ordered to a period or periods of confinement is under the age of 18,
that person must shall be committed to the custody of the Division of Prisons
of the Department of Adult Correction and shall be confined in a detention
facility approved by the Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of
Public Safety to provide secure confinement and care for juveniles or to a
holdover facility as defined in G.S. 7B-1501(11). operated by the Division of
Prisons. If the person being ordered to a period or periods of confinement
reaches the age of 18 years while in confinement, the person may be
transported by personnel of the Division of Juvenile Justice, Prisons, or
personnel approved by the Division of Juvenile Justice, Prisons, to the custody
of the sheriff of the applicable local confinement facility."
SECTION 8.(f) G.S. 15A-1343.2(f)(6) reads as rewritten:
"(6) Submit to a period or periods of confinement in a local confinement facility
for a total of no more than six days per month during any three separate
months during the period of probation. The six days per month confinement
House Bill 483-Second Edition Page 11

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
provided for in this subdivision may only be imposed as two-day or three-day
consecutive periods. When a defendant is on probation for multiple
judgments, confinement periods imposed under this subdivision shall run
concurrently and may total no more than six days per month. If the person
being ordered to a period or periods of confinement is under the age of 18,
that person must shall be committed to the custody of the Division of Prisons
of the Department of Adult Correction and shall be confined in a detention
facility approved by the Division of Juvenile Justice to provide secure
confinement and care for juveniles or to a holdover facility as defined in
G.S. 7B-1501(11). operated by the Division of Prisons. If the person being
ordered to a period or periods of confinement reaches the age of 18 years while
in confinement, the person may be transported by personnel of the Division
of Juvenile Justice, Prisons, or personnel approved by the Division of Juvenile
Justice, Prisons, to the custody of the sheriff of the applicable local
confinement facility."
SECTION 8.(g) G.S. 15A-1344(d2) reads as rewritten:
"(d2) Confinement in Response to Violation. – When a defendant under supervision for a
felony conviction has violated a condition of probation other than G.S. 15A-1343(b)(1) or
G.S. 15A-1343(b)(3a), the court may impose a period of confinement of 90 consecutive days to
be served in the custody of the Division of Community Supervision and Reentry of the
Department of Adult Correction. The court may not revoke probation unless the defendant has
previously received a total of two periods of confinement under this subsection. A defendant may
receive only two periods of confinement under this subsection. The 90-day term of confinement
ordered under this subsection for a felony shall not be reduced by credit for time already served
in the case. Any such credit shall instead be applied to the suspended sentence. However, if the
time remaining on the maximum imposed sentence on a defendant under supervision for a felony
conviction is 90 days or less, then the term of confinement is for the remaining period of the
sentence. Confinement under this section shall be credited pursuant to G.S. 15-196.1.
When a defendant under supervision for a misdemeanor conviction sentenced pursuant to
Article 81B of Chapter 15A of the General Statutes has violated a condition of probation other
than G.S. 15A-1343(b)(1) or G.S. 15A-1343(b)(3a), the court may impose a period of
confinement pursuant to G.S. 15A-1343(a1)(3). If the person being ordered to a period of
confinement is under the age of 18, that person must shall be committed to the Division of Prisons
of the Department of Adult Correction and shall be confined in a detention facility approved by
the Division of Juvenile Justice to provide secure confinement and care for juveniles or to a
holdover facility as defined in G.S. 7B-1501(11). operated by the Division of Prisons. If the
person being ordered to a period of confinement reaches the age of 18 years while in confinement,
the person may be transported by personnel of the Division of Juvenile Justice, Prisons, or
personnel approved by the Division of Juvenile Justice, Prisons, to the custody of the sheriff of
the applicable local confinement facility. The court may not revoke probation unless the
defendant has previously received at least two periods of confinement for violating a condition
of probation other than G.S. 15A-1343(b)(1) or G.S. 15A-1343(b)(3a). Those periods of
confinement may have been imposed pursuant to G.S. 15A-1343(a1)(3), 15A-1343.2(e)(5), or
15A-1343.2(f)(6). The second period of confinement must have been imposed for a violation that
occurred after the defendant served the first period of confinement. Confinement under this
section shall be credited pursuant to G.S. 15-196.1.
When a defendant under supervision for a misdemeanor conviction not sentenced pursuant
to Article 81B of Chapter 15A of the General Statutes has violated a condition of probation other
than G.S. 15A-1343(b)(1) or G.S. 15A-1343(b)(3a), the court may impose a period of
confinement of up to 90 consecutive days to be served where the defendant would have served
an active sentence. The court may not revoke probation unless the defendant has previously
Page 12 House Bill 483-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
received a total of two periods of confinement under this subsection. A defendant may receive
only two periods of confinement under this subsection. Confinement under this section shall be
credited pursuant to G.S. 15-196.1.
The period of confinement imposed under this subsection on a defendant who is on probation
for multiple offenses shall run concurrently on all cases related to the violation. Confinement
shall be immediate unless otherwise specified by the court."
SECTION 8.(h) G.S. 15A-1344(e) reads as rewritten:
"(e) Special Probation in Response to Violation. – When a defendant has violated a
condition of probation, the court may modify the probation to place the defendant on special
probation as provided in this subsection. In placing the defendant on special probation, the court
may continue or modify the conditions of probation and in addition require that the defendant
submit to a period or periods of imprisonment, either continuous or noncontinuous, at whatever
time or intervals within the period of probation the court determines. In addition to any other
conditions of probation which the court may impose, the court shall impose, when imposing a
period or periods of imprisonment as a condition of special probation, the condition that the
defendant obey the rules and regulations of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult
Correction and, if applicable, the Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety,
governing conduct of inmates, and this condition shall apply to the defendant whether or not the
court imposes it as a part of the written order. If imprisonment is for continuous periods, the
confinement may be in either the custody of the Division of Community Supervision and Reentry
of the Department of Adult Correction or a local confinement facility. Noncontinuous periods of
imprisonment under special probation may only be served in a designated local confinement or
treatment facility. If the person being ordered to a period or periods of imprisonment, either
continuous or noncontinuous, is under the age of 18, that person must shall be committed to the
Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction and shall be imprisoned in a detention
facility approved by the Division of Juvenile Justice to provide secure confinement and care for
juveniles or to a holdover facility as defined in G.S. 7B-1501(11). operated by the Division of
Prisons. If the person being ordered to a period or periods of imprisonment reaches the age of 18
years while imprisoned, the person may be transported by personnel of the Division of Juvenile
Justice, Prisons, or personnel approved by the Division of Juvenile Justice, Prisons, to the custody
of the sheriff of the applicable local confinement facility.
Except for probationary sentences for impaired driving under G.S. 20-138.1, the total of all
periods of confinement imposed as an incident of special probation, but not including an activated
suspended sentence, may not exceed one-fourth the maximum sentence of imprisonment
imposed for the offense. For probationary sentences for impaired driving under G.S. 20-138.1,
the total of all periods of confinement imposed as an incident of special probation, but not
including an activated suspended sentence, shall not exceed one-fourth the maximum penalty
allowed by law. No confinement other than an activated suspended sentence may be required
beyond the period of probation or beyond two years of the time the special probation is imposed,
whichever comes first."
SECTION 8.(i) G.S. 15A-1351(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) The judge may sentence to special probation a defendant convicted of a criminal
offense other than impaired driving under G.S. 20-138.1, if based on the defendant's prior record
or conviction level as found pursuant to Article 81B of this Chapter, an intermediate punishment
is authorized for the class of offense of which the defendant has been convicted. A defendant
convicted of impaired driving under G.S. 20-138.1 may also be sentenced to special probation.
Under a sentence of special probation, the court may suspend the term of imprisonment and place
the defendant on probation as provided in Article 82, Probation, and in addition require that the
defendant submit to a period or periods of imprisonment in the custody of the Division of
Community Supervision and Reentry of the Department of Adult Correction or a designated local
confinement or treatment facility at whatever time or intervals within the period of probation,
House Bill 483-Second Edition Page 13

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
consecutive or nonconsecutive, the court determines, as provided in this subsection. For
probationary sentences for misdemeanors, including impaired driving under G.S. 20-138.1, all
imprisonment under this subsection shall be in a designated local confinement or treatment
facility. If the person being ordered to a period or periods of imprisonment is under the age of
18, that person must shall be committed to the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult
Correction and shall be imprisoned in a detention facility approved by the Division of Juvenile
Justice to provide secure confinement and care for juveniles or to a holdover facility as defined
in G.S. 7B-1501(11). operated by the Division of Prisons. Personnel of the Division of Juvenile
Justice of the Department of Public Safety, or personnel approved by the Division of Juvenile
Justice, shall transport the person to the facility operated by the Division of Prisons if the person
is in custody of the Division of Juvenile Justice at the time of commitment. If the person being
ordered to a period or periods of imprisonment reaches the age of 18 years while imprisoned, the
person may be transported by personnel of the Division of Juvenile Justice, Prisons, or personnel
approved by the Division of Juvenile Justice, Prisons, to the custody of the sheriff of the
applicable local confinement facility. In addition to any other conditions of probation which the
court may impose, the court shall impose, when imposing a period or periods of imprisonment
as a condition of special probation, the condition that the defendant obey the Rules and
Regulations of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction and, if applicable,
the Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety, governing conduct of
inmates, and this condition shall apply to the defendant whether or not the court imposes it as a
part of the written order. Except for probationary sentences for misdemeanors, including
impaired driving under G.S. 20-138.1, if imprisonment is for continuous periods, the
confinement may be in the custody of either the Division of Community Supervision and Reentry
of the Department of Adult Correction or a local confinement facility. Noncontinuous periods of
imprisonment under special probation may only be served in a designated local confinement or
treatment facility. If the person being ordered continuous or noncontinuous periods of
imprisonment is under the age of 18, that person must shall be committed to the Division of
Prisons and shall be imprisoned in a detention facility approved by the Division of Juvenile
Justice to provide secure confinement and care for juveniles or to a holdover facility as defined
in G.S. 7B-1501(11). operated by the Division of Prisons. Personnel of the Division of Juvenile
Justice, or personnel approved by the Division of Juvenile Justice, shall transport the person to
the facility operated by the Division of Prisons if the person is in custody of the Division of
Juvenile Justice at the time of commitment. If the person being ordered to a period or periods of
imprisonment reaches the age of 18 years while imprisoned, the person may be transported by
personnel of the Division of Juvenile Justice, Prisons, or personnel approved by the Juvenile
Justice Division, Division of Prisons, to the custody of the sheriff of the applicable local
confinement facility. Except for probationary sentences of impaired driving under G.S. 20-138.1,
the total of all periods of confinement imposed as an incident of special probation, but not
including an activated suspended sentence, may not exceed one-fourth the maximum sentence of
imprisonment imposed for the offense, and no confinement other than an activated suspended
sentence may be required beyond two years of conviction. For probationary sentences for
impaired driving under G.S. 20-138.1, the total of all periods of confinement imposed as an
incident of special probation, but not including an activated suspended sentence, shall not exceed
one-fourth the maximum penalty allowed by law. In imposing a sentence of special probation,
the judge may credit any time spent committed or confined, as a result of the charge, to either the
suspended sentence or to the imprisonment required for special probation. The original period of
probation, including the period of imprisonment required for special probation, shall be as
specified in G.S. 15A-1343.2(d), but may not exceed a maximum of five years, except as
provided by G.S. 15A-1342(a). The court may revoke, modify, or terminate special probation as
otherwise provided for probationary sentences."
SECTION 8.(j) G.S. 15A-1352 reads as rewritten:
Page 14 House Bill 483-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"§ 15A-1352. Commitment to Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction
or local confinement facility.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (f) of this section, a person sentenced to
imprisonment for a misdemeanor under this Article or for nonpayment of a fine for conviction
of a misdemeanor under Article 84 of this Chapter shall be committed for the term designated by
the court to the Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Program as provided in G.S. 148-32.1 or,
if the period is for 90 days or less, to a local confinement facility, except as provided for in
G.S. 148-32.1(b).
If a person is sentenced to imprisonment for a misdemeanor under this Article or for
nonpayment of a fine under Article 84 of this Chapter, the sentencing judge may make a finding
of fact as to whether the person would be suitable for placement in a county satellite jail/work
release unit operated pursuant to G.S. 153A-230.3. If the sentencing judge makes a finding of
fact that the person would be suitable for placement in a county satellite jail/work release unit
and the person meets the requirements listed in G.S. 153A-230.3(a)(1), then the custodian of the
local confinement facility may transfer the misdemeanant to a county satellite jail/work release
unit.
If the person sentenced to imprisonment is under the age of 18, the person must shall be
committed to a detention facility approved by the Division of Juvenile Justice to provide secure
confinement and care for juveniles. the custody of the Division of Prisons of the Department of
Adult Correction and shall be confined in a facility operated by the Division of Prisons. Personnel
of the Division of Juvenile Justice or personnel approved by the Division of Juvenile Justice shall
transport the person to the detention facility. facility operated by the Division of Prisons, if the
person is in the custody of the Division of Juvenile Justice at the time of commitment. If the
person sentenced to imprisonment reaches the age of 18 years while imprisoned, the person may
be transported by personnel of the Juvenile Justice Division, Division of Prisons, or personnel
approved by the Juvenile Justice Division, Division of Prisons, to the custody of the sheriff of
the applicable local confinement facility.
…
(f) A person sentenced to imprisonment of any duration for impaired driving under
G.S. 20-138.1, other than imprisonment required as a condition of special probation under
G.S. 15A-1351(a) or G.S. 15A-1344(e), shall be committed to the Statewide Misdemeanant
Confinement Program established under G.S. 148-32.1.
If the person sentenced to imprisonment is under the age of 18, the person must shall be
committed to a detention facility approved by the Division of Juvenile Justice to provide secure
confinement and care for juveniles. the custody of the Division of Prisons of the Department of
Adult Correction and shall be confined in a facility operated by the Division of Prisons. Personnel
of the Division of Juvenile Justice or personnel approved by the Division of Juvenile Justice shall
transport the person to the detention facility. facility operated by the Division of Prisons, if the
person is in the custody of the Division of Juvenile Justice at the time of commitment. If the
person sentenced to imprisonment reaches the age of 18 years while imprisoned, the person may
be transported by personnel of the Division of Juvenile Justice, Prisons, or personnel approved
by the Division of Juvenile Justice, Prisons, to the custody of the sheriff of the applicable local
confinement facility.
…."
SECTION 8.(k) G.S. 148-13 reads as rewritten:
"§ 148-13. Regulations as to custody grades, privileges, gain time credit, etc.
…
(a1) The Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction shall adopt rules to specify the
rates at, and circumstances under, which earned time authorized by G.S. 15A-1340.13(d) and
G.S. 15A-1340.20(d) may be earned or forfeited by persons serving activated sentences of
imprisonment for felony or misdemeanor convictions. Such rules shall include any person
House Bill 483-Second Edition Page 15

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
serving an activated sentence of imprisonment who is confined in a detention facility approved
by the Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety.
…
(e) The Secretary's regulations concerning earned time and good time credits authorized
by this section shall be distributed to and followed by local jail administrators and by personnel
of the Division of Juvenile Justice or personnel approved by the Division of Juvenile Justice with
regard to sentenced jail prisoners, including prisoners housed in a detention facility approved by
the Division of Juvenile Justice.prisoners.
…."
SECTION 8.(l) G.S. 148-32.1(e) reads as rewritten:
"(e) Upon entry of a prisoner serving a sentence of imprisonment for impaired driving
under G.S. 20-138.1 into a local confinement facility or to a detention facility approved by the
Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety a person under the age of 18
confined in a facility operated by the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction
pursuant to this section, the custodian of the local confinement facility or detention facility
operated by the Division of Prisons shall forward to the Post-Release Supervision and Parole
Commission information pertaining to the prisoner so as to make him eligible for parole
consideration pursuant to G.S. 15A-1371. Such information shall include date of incarceration,
jail credit, and such other information as may be required by the Post-Release Supervision and
Parole Commission. The Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission shall approve a form
upon which the custodian shall furnish this information, which form will be provided to the
custodian by the Division of Prisons."
SECTION 8.(m) G.S. 20-179(k5)(5) reads as rewritten:
"(5) Submit to a period or periods of confinement in a local confinement facility
for a total of no more than six days per month during any three separate
months during the period of probation. The six days per month confinement
provided for in this subdivision may only be imposed as two-day or three-day
consecutive periods. When a defendant is on probation for multiple
judgments, confinement periods imposed under this subdivision shall run
concurrently and may total no more than six days per month. If the person
being ordered to a period or periods of confinement is under the age of 18,
that person must shall be confined in a detention facility approved by the
Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety to provide
secure confinement and care for juveniles or to a holdover facility as defined
in G.S. 7B-1501(11). operated by the Division of Prisons of the Department
of Adult Correction. If the person being ordered to a period or periods of
confinement reaches the age of 18 years while in confinement, the person may
be transported by personnel of the Division of Juvenile Justice, Prisons, or
personnel approved by the Division of Juvenile Justice, Prisons, to the custody
of the sheriff of the applicable local confinement facility."
SECTION 8.(n) G.S. 15-6 reads as rewritten:
"§ 15-6. Imprisonment to be in county jail.
No person over the age of 18 shall be imprisoned except in the common jail of the county,
unless otherwise provided by law: Provided, that whenever the sheriff of any county shall be
imprisoned, he may be imprisoned in the jail of any adjoining county. If the person being
imprisoned is under the age of 18, that person shall be imprisoned in a detention facility approved
by the Division of Juvenile Justice to provide secure confinement and care for juveniles, or to a
holdover facility as defined in G.S. 7B-1501(11).committed to the custody of the Division of
Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction and shall be confined in a facility operated by the
Division of Prisons."

Page 16 House Bill 483-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
PART IX. SAVINGS CLAUSE AND EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 9.(a) Prosecutions for offenses committed before the effective date of
this act are not abated or affected by this act, and the statutes that would be applicable but for
this act remain applicable to those prosecutions.
SECTION 9.(b) Parts I through VII of this act become effective December 1, 2025,
and apply to offenses committed on or after that date. Part VIII of this act becomes effective
December 1, 2025, and applies to offenses committed, sentences imposed, and any other orders
of imprisonment issued on or after that date. The remainder of this act is effective when it
becomes law.
House Bill 483-Second Edition Page 17